New York, session 2025-2026, S10243.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1111-c of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (p) to read as follows: 3 (p) It shall be an affirmative defense to any notice of liability 4 issued for standing, stopping, or parking in a bus lane in violation of 5 the applicable provisions of section 4-08 of chapter four of title thir- 6 ty-four of the rules of the city of New York pursuant to a bus rapid 7 transit program adopted pursuant to this section that the operator of 8 the vehicle was attending religious services at the time of such 9 violation. 10 § 2. Section 1111-c-1 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 11 adding a new subdivision (r) to read as follows: 12 (r) It shall be an affirmative defense to any notice of liability 13 issued for a violation of section 4-08(e)(9) or 4-08(f)(4) of chapter 14 four of title thirty-four of the rules of the city of New York pursuant 15 to a demonstration program adopted pursuant to this section that the 16 operator of the vehicle was attending religious services at the time of 17 such violation. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however that the 19 amendments to sections 1111-c and 1111-c-1 of the vehicle and traffic 20 law made by sections one and two of this act shall not affect the repeal 21 of such sections and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15779-01-6